Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1405
Salary; determination.

In counties having a county comptroller, as provided for in section 23-1401, such comptroller may receive a salary as determined by the county board.

Laws 1917, c. 167, § 1, p. 376;

C.S.1922, § 4941;

C.S.1929, § 26-1105;

R.S.1943, § 23-1405;

Laws 1991, LB 798, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 729, § 1.